North Dakota, session 69, SB2218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER - NORTH DAKOTA FIREFIGHTER'S ASSOCIATION GRANT - ONE-
TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and
improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $500,000, or so much
of the sum as may be necessary, to the insurance commissioner for the purpose of providing a grant to
the North Dakota firefighter's association, for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and
ending June 30, 2027. Grant funds must be used only to defray the costs associated with a new
firefighter's association building. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2218 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2218 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 68 Nays 22 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State